Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Classroom Learning Environment Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11063 SW 01/01/25






Req. No. 11063 Page 1